Florida, session 2026, HB1169.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subsection (7) of section
553.80, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
553.80 Enforcement.—
(7)(a) The governing bodies of local governments may
provide a schedule of reasonable fees, as authorized by s.
125.56(2) or s. 166.222 and this section, for enforcing this
part. These fees, and any fines or investment earnings related
to the fees, may only be used for carrying out the local
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1169-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1169 2026
government's responsibilities in enforcing the Florida Building
Code, including, but not limited to, any process or enforcement
related to obtaining or finalizing a building permit. When
providing a schedule of reasonable fees, the total estimated
annual revenue derived from fees, and the fines and investment
earnings related to the fees, may not exceed the total estimated
annual costs of allowable activities. Any unexpended balances
must be carried forward to future years for allowable activities
or must be refunded at the discretion of the local government. A
local government may not carry forward an amount exceeding the
average of its operating budget for enforcing the Florida
Building Code for the previous 4 fiscal years. For purposes of
this subsection, the term "operating budget" does not include
reserve amounts. Any amount exceeding this limit must be used as
authorized in subparagraph 2. However, a local government that
established, as of January 1, 2019, a Building Inspections Fund
Advisory Board consisting of five members from the construction
stakeholder community and carries an unexpended balance in
excess of the average of its operating budget for the previous 4
fiscal years may continue to carry such excess funds forward
upon the recommendation of the advisory board. The basis for a
fee structure for allowable activities must relate to the level
of service provided by the local government and must include
consideration for refunding fees due to reduced services based
on services provided as prescribed by s. 553.791, but not
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1169-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1169 2026
provided by the local government. Fees charged must be
consistently applied.
1. As used in this subsection, the phrase "enforcing the
Florida Building Code" includes the direct costs and reasonable
indirect costs associated with review of building plans,
building inspections, reinspections, and building permit
processing; building code enforcement; and fire inspections
associated with new construction. The phrase may also include
training costs associated with the enforcement of the Florida
Building Code and enforcement action pertaining to unlicensed
contractor activity to the extent not funded by other user fees.
2. A local government must use any excess funds that it is
prohibited from carrying forward to rebate and reduce fees, to
upgrade technology hardware and software systems to enhance
service delivery, to pay for the construction of a building or
structure that houses a local government's building code
enforcement agency, or for training programs for building
officials, inspectors, or plans examiners associated with the
enforcement of the Florida Building Code. A local government is
not eligible to receive state funds through a local funding
initiative request if the local government has been subject to a
legislative committee's audit concerning the use of excess funds
within 1 year after the local government's request or if the
local government does not submit in its local funding initiative
request to its legislative delegation an affirmation stating
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1169-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1169 2026
that it is no longer the subject of such state audit. Each
appropriate legislative committee shall report a list of all
local governments that have been subject to an audit or that
have not submitted an affirmation to the presiding officers and
the chairs of the legislative appropriations committees Excess
funds used to construct such a building or structure must be
designated for such purpose by the local government and may not
be carried forward for more than 4 consecutive years. An owner
or a builder who has a valid building permit issued by a local
government for a fee, or an association of owners or builders
located in this the state that has members with valid building
permits issued by a local government for a fee, may bring a
civil action against the local government that issued the permit
for a fee to enforce this subparagraph.
3. The following activities may not be funded with fees
adopted for enforcing the Florida Building Code:
a. Planning and zoning or other general government
activities not related to obtaining a building permit.
b. Inspections of public buildings for a reduced fee or no
fee.
c. Public information requests, community functions,
boards, and any program not directly related to enforcement of
the Florida Building Code.
d. Enforcement and implementation of any other local
100 ordinance, excluding validly adopted local amendments to the
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1169-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1169 2026
101 Florida Building Code and excluding any local ordinance directly
102 related to enforcing the Florida Building Code as defined in
103 subparagraph 1.
104 4. A local government must use recognized management,
105 accounting, and oversight practices to ensure that fees, fines,
106 and investment earnings generated under this subsection are
107 maintained and allocated or used solely for the purposes
108 described in subparagraph 1.
109 5. The local enforcement agency, independent district, or
110 special district may not require at any time, including at the
111 time of application for a permit, the payment of any additional
112 fees, charges, or expenses associated with:
113 a. Providing proof of licensure under chapter 489;
114 b. Recording or filing a license issued under this
115 chapter;
116 c. Providing, recording, or filing evidence of workers'
117 compensation insurance coverage as required by chapter 440; or
118 d. Charging surcharges or other similar fees not directly
119 related to enforcing the Florida Building Code.
120 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1169-01-c1